Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 1. Community Development Authority
§ 9-7-110.
Community development authority; revenue bonds; debt service reserve funds; use of monies therein.

Prior to the delivery of each bond issue, the authority may create one (1) or more debt service reserve funds and, at the time the authority determines, shall pay into the funds an amount, as determined by the authority, from:

Proceeds of sale of bonds to the extent provided in the resolution of the authority authorizing the issuance; and

Other monies which may be received or made available to the authority for the purposes of funds from any other source.

Unless otherwise provided, the monies held in or credited to any debt service reserve fund established under this section shall be used solely for the payment of the principal of bonds of the authority secured by the reserve fund, as the bonds mature or are redeemed prior to maturity, the purchase of such bonds of the authority, the payment of interest on such bonds of the authority or the payment of any redemption premium required to be paid when the bonds are redeemed prior to maturity. The interest earned on the amount deposited in any reserve fund may be used for the purpose of defraying the cost of the authority’s operations. Money in any debt service reserve fund shall not be withdrawn if it would reduce the amount of the fund to less than the amount which is pledged in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds secured by the debt service reserve fund, except for the purpose of paying principal and interest on bonds maturing and becoming due, and for the payment of which other monies of the authority are not available.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-839; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-114; Laws 1978, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to state debt service fund, see §

9-4-204

.

Revenue bonds funded by excise tax revenue within constitutionaldebt limit prohibitions. —

Revenue bonds issued by the authority, for the payment of which excise tax revenue to be derived in future years is committed under the so-called “special” fund theory, comes within the debt limit prohibitions of art. 16, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978) (decided prior to 1978 amendment).

And former provisions unconstitutional. —

Former subsections (b) and (c) as they existed prior to the 1978 amendment, insofar as (c) related to the special reserve fund, violated art. 16, § 2, Wyo. Const., because upon the establishment of a special reserve fund, the state of Wyoming became obligated to deposit money into the fund from excise taxes which might not yet have been collected, thereby constituting the creation of a debt in excess of taxes. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 9-7-111.
Community development authority; revenue bonds; disposition of monies received.

Monies received pursuant to the authority of this act, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, receipts or income, shall be held as trust funds to be applied solely as provided in the proceedings under which the bonds are authorized. The trustee shall hold and apply the monies for the purposes authorized by this act and by the proceedings authorizing the bonds and included in the trust agreement securing the bonds.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-840; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-115; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

9-7-101

.

Cited

in

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 9-7-112.
Exemptions from taxation; exceptions.

The exercise of the powers granted by this act constitutes the performance of an essential governmental function. The authority shall not be required to pay any taxes levied by any municipality or political subdivision of the state, other than assessments for local improvements, upon its projects, property or monies. The authority shall not be required to pay state taxes of any kind. Except for estate taxes the authority’s projects, property and monies and any bonds issued under this act and the income therefrom, shall be free from taxation of every kind by the state, municipalities and political subdivisions of the state.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-841; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-116; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1984, ch. 43, § 2; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to exemption of municipal housing bonds from taxation, see §

15-10-108

.

As to exemption of refunding securities generally from taxation, see §

16-5-117

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

9-7-101

.

§ 9-7-113.
Bonds as legal investments.

The bonds of the authority are legal investments which may be used as collateral for public funds of the state, insurance companies, banks, savings and loan associations, investment companies, trustees and other fiduciaries which may properly and legally invest funds in their control or belonging to them in bonds of the authority.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-842; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-117; Laws 1978, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, § 1; 1979, ch. 103, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to investment of public funds generally, see §§

9-4-701

et seq. and

9-4-831

.

§ 9-7-114.
State pledge not to impair bondholder's rights and remedies.

The state pledges to the holders of any bonds issued under this act, that the state will not limit or alter the rights vested in the authority to fulfill the terms of agreements made with the holders, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders until the bonds together with the interest, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders are fully met and discharged. The authority is authorized to include this pledge of the state in any agreement with the holders of the bonds.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-843; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-118; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

9-7-101

.

Section constitutes clear effort to create unconstitutionaldebt. —

The guarantee in this section constitutes a clear effort by the legislature to create a state debt in excess of the taxes for the current year, without having put the proposition to a vote of the people and by them approved, in violation of the express prohibition of art. 16, § 2, Wyo. Const.Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 9-7-115.
Appointment of trustee by bondholders; powers and duties thereof.

If the authority defaults in the payment of principal of or interest on any bonds after they become due, whether at maturity or upon call for redemption, and the default continues for a period of thirty (30) days, or if the authority fails or refuses to comply with the provisions of this act, or defaults in any agreement made with the holders of any bonds, the holders of twenty-five percent (25%) in aggregate principal amount of the bonds of the issue then outstanding, by instrument or instruments filed in the office of the secretary of state, may appoint a trustee to represent the holders of the bonds for the purposes herein provided.

The trustee may, and upon written request of the holders of twenty-five percent (25%) in principal amount of such bonds then outstanding shall, in his or its own name:

By suit, action or proceeding enforce all rights of the bondholders to require the authority to carry out any other agreements with the holders of the bonds and to perform its duties under this act;

Bring suit upon the bonds;

By action or suit, require the authority to account as if it were the trustee of an express trust for the holders of the bonds;

By action or suit, enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the holders of the bonds;

Declare all the bonds due and payable, and if all defaults are made good, then, with the consent of the holders of twenty-five percent (25%) of the principal amount of the bonds then outstanding, to annul the declaration and its consequences.

In addition, the trustee has all the powers necessary or appropriate for the exercise of any functions specifically set forth in this act or incident to the general representation of bondholders in the enforcement and protection of their rights.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-844; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-119; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to state claim against municipality unable to pay bonded indebtedness, see §

9-4-706

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

9-7-101

.

Cited

in

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 9-7-116.
Investment and management of funds.

The authority may invest funds in securities in which state funds may be invested as provided by law or in savings certificates of savings and loan associations and certificates of deposit of banks to the extent they are fully insured by a federal agency or are fully secured by a pledge of assets as provided by law, sell securities it has purchased and deposit securities in any financial institution. Funds deposited in financial institutions shall be secured by obligations authorized as permissible security for state investments. In investing and managing its funds, the authority shall exercise the judgment and care which persons of prudence, discretion and intelligence would exercise under similar circumstances in managing the permanent disposition of their funds, considering the probable income and the probable safety of their capital.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the authority may contract with the holders of any of its bonds, as to the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of any monies of the authority, of any monies held in trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds, and may carry out the contract. Monies held in trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds or in any way to secure bonds and deposits of monies may be secured in the same manner as monies of the authority and all banks and trust companies are authorized to give security for these deposits.

Subject to agreements with bondholders, the authority shall prescribe a system of accounts in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

The authority shall employ a certified public accountant to examine the books and accounts of the authority including its receipts, disbursements, contracts, reserve funds, sinking funds, investments and any other matters relating to its financial standing. The examination shall be conducted at least once in each year and copies of the examination report shall be filed with the secretary of state, the director of the state department of audit and the legislative service office.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-845; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-120; Laws 1979, ch. 103, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 135, § 1; 1988, ch. 87, § 2; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1995, ch. 199, § 1.

§ 9-7-117.
Assistance by state agencies.

Upon request of the authority, any state agency may temporarily assign to the authority officers and employees as it deems necessary to assist the authority in carrying out its functions and duties under this act. Officers and employees so assigned shall not lose their status or rights as public employees.

Upon request of the authority, any state agency may lend technical assistance, render advice and attend meetings with the directors and employees of the authority as the authority requires in carrying out its functions and duties.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-846; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-121; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to state agencies generally, see chapter 2 of this title.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

9-7-101

.

§ 9-7-118.
Annual report and budget.

The authority shall submit an annual report in the manner provided by W.S.

9-2-1014

.

The authority shall submit its budget for review as provided by W.S.

9-2-1010

through

9-2-1014

. This section shall not impair or affect any pledge of special funds of the authority to the payment of the revenue bonds authorized by this act.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-847, W.S. 1977, § 9-18-122; Laws 1979, ch. 103, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to pledging of revenue to bonds issued by authority, see §

9-7-109

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

9-7-101

.

Applied

in

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 9-7-119.
Conflicts of interest.

The authority shall not purchase from, sell to, borrow from, loan to, contract with or otherwise deal with any corporation, trust, association, partnership or other entity in which any director of the authority has a financial interest. This section does not prohibit the buying, selling or placing of mortgage loans with financial institutions in which a director has a financial interest. The financial interest shall be disclosed in the minutes of the authority.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 87, § 3.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-848; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-123; Laws 1979, ch. 103, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1988, ch. 87, §§ 2, 3.

Severability. —

Section 3, ch. 188, Laws 1975, reads: “If any portion of this act is declared invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, such decision shall be limited to the portions found invalid, and shall not affect or invalidate the remaining portions of this act, which shall remain in full force and effect.”

§ 9-7-120.
Priorities in commitment of monies.

The authority shall require as a condition to receiving any of its money under this chapter that any mortgage lender receiving money, within the limitation imposed by the amount of money received, shall give reasonable priority to mortgage loan applications made directly to the mortgage lender by qualified, individual home purchasers, before committing any money received from the authority to contractors, builders, real estate developers or real estate agents, except to the extent the authority determines there is a need to encourage the construction of affordable housing and it is reasonable and appropriate to provide or permit commitments to alleviate such need. Any money committed by a mortgage lender to an individual home purchaser under this act may be used for the purchase of new or existing residential dwellings.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 14, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-124; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 5, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

9-7-101

.

§ 9-7-121.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 44, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to unlawful use of false statements to obtain property or credit, see §

6-3-612

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1980, ch. 14, § 1, related to making false statements in connection with applications for money.

§ 9-7-122.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 87, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to economic development loans, see §

9-7-125

.

Editor's notes. —

This section was derived from Laws 1984, ch. 43, § 1, relating to the authority to issue bonds for economic development projects.

§ 9-7-123.
Economic development projects; insurance fund.

The authority may insure payments required by a loan, lease or other credit arrangement for any project or economic development project financed, under terms and conditions prescribed by the authority. The authority may establish one (1) or more separate accounts and may require the payment of fees or premiums, establish application fees and prescribe application, notification, contract and guaranty forms, rules, regulations and guidelines.

Insurance acquired by the authority shall:

Be for a project or an economic development project meeting policies and objectives of this act;

Be through an applicant approved by the authority;

Contain amortization provisions satisfactory to the authority; and

Be for a principal amount, in a form and contain terms for payment of property insurance, repairs, alterations, taxes, assessments, delinquency charges and default remedies as the authority determines necessary.

The authority may enter into an insurance contract, guarantee or other agreement or contract for the insurance fund and any insured loan, lease or other credit agreement. The agreement or contract may contain terms necessary for the insurance program subject to established requirements, including terms relating to loan documentation, review, approval procedures, origination and servicing rights and responsibilities, default obligations and other loan procedures and obligations.

Any contract for insurance made under this section shall provide that claims are payable from the insurance fund or a separate account in the insurance fund. The obligation of the authority to make payments under any insurance contract is limited solely to the insurance fund and is not a debt or liability of the state. Any insurance contract and any rule, regulation or guideline of the authority implementing the insurance program may contain other terms, provisions or conditions the authority considers necessary. Any premium for insuring a loan payment under this section may be determined on a basis, payable by a person in an amount and at a time determined by the authority. The premium amount may differ among any insured loan, lease or other credit agreement.

The authority shall establish an insurance fund held by a trustee or other fiduciary designated by the authority. All insurance fees and premiums shall be deposited into the fund along with up to two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000.00) prior to April 1, 1985 and an additional one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) thereafter from other revenues and assets of the authority as the authority considers necessary to comply with any contract or agreement entered into under this section.

The insurance fund shall be used to satisfy any claim resulting from a defaulted loan, lease or other credit agreement. The fund may also be used for any other purpose prescribed by the authority pursuant to guaranty contracts with financial institutions under this section including the protection of the authority’s interest in projects during periods of delinquency or upon default.

The minimum reserve requirement for the insurance fund shall be an amount provided by agreement, resolution or indenture with bond holders. No additional loan, lease or other credit agreement may be insured if the amount available in the insurance fund is less than the minimum reserve requirement.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 43, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 5, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

9-7-101

.

§ 9-7-124.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 199, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1984, ch. 43, § 1, related to the obligation of the state department of audit to audit financial records.

§ 9-7-125.
Subsidiary corporation; economic development loans.

The authority may charter a subsidiary corporation for the purpose of managing or originating economic development loans subject to the following conditions:

The directors of the authority shall also be directors of the subsidiary corporation and are entitled to the same compensation and expenses for such service as provided by W.S. 9-7-104(b) so long as the services do not occur on the same day;

The subsidiary corporation shall not take equity positions through stock ownership in any corporation or association;

The subsidiary corporation is subject to the audit requirements of W.S.

9-7-116

and the financial supervision requirements of W.S. 9-7-105(b);

The subsidiary corporation shall not acquire or originate any economic development loans on and after the effective date of this act;

This section is retroactive and prospective in its application.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 87, § 1; 1995, ch. 199, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

9-7-101

.